District of Columbia statutes.
10-1181.07

Enforcement.

(a)

Violations of this chapter or a rule issued in accordance with this chapter may be punished by imprisonment of not more than 90 days.

(b)

The Mayor may maintain an action in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia to enjoin any continuing violation of this chapter or a regulation issued pursuant to this chapter.

(c)

Civil fines and penalties may be imposed as alternative sanctions for any infraction of the provisions of this chapter or any rules issued in accordance with this chapter, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2 [§ 2-1801.01 et seq.] (“Civil Infractions Act”). Enforcement and adjudication of an infraction shall be pursuant to the Civil Infractions Act.

(d)

The Mayor may also enforce this chapter or any rules issued in accordance with this chapter pursuant to § 50-921.19(a), (c), (d), (e), and (f); provided, that references to the Director in § 50-921.19(a), (c), (d), (e), and (f) shall be deemed to be references to the Mayor for the purposes of this subsection.

Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 6026b
as added Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-207, § 9, 61 DCR 12690

History

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-207: Section 12(a) of D.C. Law 20-207 provided that §§ 2(a), 2(b)(1), 2(b)(2)(A), 2(b)(2)(B), 2(b)(2)(C), 2(c), 3, 4, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, and 11 shall apply as of March 11, 2015.

Editor's Notes